District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.17

No private right of action against the District.

Nothing in this subchapter is intended to, or does, create a private right of action against the government of the District of Columbia and its officers, employees, agents, representatives, contractors, successors, and assigns based upon compliance or noncompliance with its provisions. No person or entity may assert any claim or right as a beneficiary or protected class under this subchapter in any civil, criminal, or administrative action against the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 18, 56 DCR 1596